dev/he.dix
    <pardef n="ח/יסיון__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>יסיון</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיון</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיוני</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיוננו</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיונך</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיונך</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיונכם</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיונכן</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיונן</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיונו</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיונה</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיונם</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיונות</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיונות</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיונותיי</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיונותינו</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיונותיך</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיונותייך</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיונותיכם</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיונותיכן</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיונותיהן</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיונותיו</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיונותיה</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיונותיהם</l><r>יסיון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="איקונ/ין__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ין</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ין</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יני</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יננו</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ינך</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ינך</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ינכם</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ינכן</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ינן</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ינו</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ינה</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ינם</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ות</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ות</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיי</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותינו</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיך</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותייך</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיכם</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיכן</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיהן</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיו</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיה</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ותיהם</l><r>ין<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ע/יקרון__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>יקרון</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרון</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרוני</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרוננו</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרונך</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרונך</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרונכם</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרונכן</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרונן</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרונו</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרונה</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרונם</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרונות</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרונות</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרונותיי</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרונותינו</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרונותיך</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרונותייך</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרונותיכם</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרונותיכן</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרונותיהן</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרונותיו</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרונותיה</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>קרונותיהם</l><r>יקרון<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="איקונין"><i>איקונ</i><par n="איקונ/ין__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עיקרון"><i>ע</i><par n="ע/יקרון__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חיסיון"><i>ח</i><par n="ח/יסיון__n_m"/></e>
